Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1407.03
Special permit for sale at other
than established place of business; issuance.

Notwithstanding
the other provisions of the
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act restricting sales to an
established place of business, any motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer dealer
licensed in accordance with the
act may be granted a special permit to display and sell passenger
cars, motor vehicles, motorcycles, trailers, or self-propelled motor homes
at fairs, sports shows, vacation shows, and similar events, subject to the
conditions established by sections 60-1407.02 to 60-1407.04.

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 16;

Laws 1974, LB 754, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 361, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1018, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 63.